Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB852.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 3(d) and (i) and 4(a) of the act of January 17, 1968 (P.L.11, No.5), known as The Minimum Wage Act of 1968, are amended and the sections are amended by adding subsections to read:Section 3. Definitions.--As used in this act:* * *(d) "Wages" mean compensation due to any employe by reason of his or her employment, payable in legal tender of the United States or checks on banks convertible into cash on demand at full face value, subject to such deductions, charges or 123456789101112131415161718192021 allowances as may be permitted by regulations of the secretary under section 9."Wage" paid to any employe includes the reasonable cost, as determined by the secretary, to the employer for furnishing such employe with board, lodging, or other facilities, if such board, lodging, or other facilities are customarily furnished by such employer to his or her employes: Provided, That the cost of board, lodging, or other facilities shall not be included as a part of the wage paid to any employe to the extent it is excluded therefrom under the terms of a bona fide collective-bargaining agreement applicable to the particular employe: Provided, further, That the secretary is authorized to determine the fair value of such board, lodging, or other facilities for defined classes of employes and in defined areas, based on average cost to the employer or to groups of employers similarly situated, or average value to groups of employes, or other appropriate measures of fair value. Such evaluations, where applicable and pertinent, shall be used in lieu of actual measure of cost in determining the wage paid to any employe.[In determining the hourly wage an employer is required to pay a tipped employe, the amount paid such employe by his or her employer shall be an amount equal to: (i) the cash wage paid the employe which for the purposes of the determination shall be not less than the cash wage required to be paid the employe on the date immediately prior to the effective date of this subparagraph; and (ii) an additional amount on account of the tips received by the employe which is equal to the difference between the wage specified in subparagraph (i) and the wage in effect under section 4 of this act. The additional amount on account of tips may not exceed the value of tips actually 20250SB0852PN0951 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 received by the employe. The previous sentence shall not apply with respect to any tipped employe unless:(1) Such employe has been informed by the employer of the provisions of this subsection;(2) All tips received by such employe have been retained by the employe and shall not be surrendered to the employer to be used as wages to satisfy the requirement to pay the current hourly minimum rate in effect; where the gratuity is added to the charge made by the establishment, either by the management, or by the customer, the gratuity shall become the property of the employe; except that this subsection shall not be construed to prohibit the pooling of tips among employes who customarily and regularly receive tips.]* * *(i) "Gratuities" or "tips" means a voluntary, monetary [contributions] contribution received by an employe from a guest, patron or customer for services rendered.(j) "Tipped employe" means an employe who customarily and regularly receives a gratuity during the course of the employe's employment.Section 4. Minimum Wages.--Except as may otherwise be provided under this act:(a) Every employer shall pay to each of his or her employes, including tipped employes, wages for all hours worked at a rate of not less than:(1) Two dollars sixty-five cents ($2.65) an hour upon the effective date of this amendment.(2) Two dollars ninety cents ($2.90) an hour during the year beginning January 1, 1979.(3) Three dollars ten cents ($3.10) an hour during the year 20250SB0852PN0951 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 beginning January 1, 1980.(4) Three dollars thirty-five cents ($3.35) an hour after December 31, 1980.(5) Three dollars seventy cents ($3.70) an hour beginning February 1, 1989.(6) Five dollars fifteen cents ($5.15) an hour beginning September 1, 1997.(7) Six dollars twenty-five cents ($6.25) an hour beginning January 1, 2007.(8) Seven dollars fifteen cents ($7.15) an hour beginning July 1, 2007.(9) Twelve dollars ($12) an hour beginning January 1, 2026.(10) Fifteen dollars ($15) an hour beginning January 1, 2027.* * *(a.2) A municipality may enact an ordinance which requires an employer to pay each of his or her employes wages for all hours worked at a rate higher than the rate imposed under subsection (a). A copy of an ordinance adopted by a municipality under this subsection shall be submitted to the department.(a.3) Beginning January 1, 2025, and each year thereafter, the minimum wage shall be increased by an annual cost-of-living adjustment calculated by the secretary using the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area. In calculating the adjustment, the secretary shall use the most recent twelve-month period for which figures have been officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics. At least sixty days prior to the date the adjustment is due to take effect, the percentage increase and the minimum wage amount, rounded to the nearest 20250SB0852PN0951 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 multiple of five cents (5¢), shall be determined by the secretary. The secretary shall, within ten days following the determination, forward a notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(a.4) The following shall apply to tipped employes:(1) Each tipped employe shall be informed in writing by the employer, no later than twenty days after the effective date of this subsection, that the tipped employe shall be paid not less than the appropriate minimum wage under subsection (a).(2) Each gratuity received by the employe shall be retained by the employe and shall not be surrendered or paid to the employer. This paragraph shall not be deemed to prohibit the pooling of gratuities among tipped employes.(3) If a gratuity is added, either by the employer or the manager of the establishment or by the guest, patron or customer, to the charge to the guest, patron or customer, the gratuity shall become the property of the tipped employe and shall not be used by the employer to satisfy the requirement to pay the wage then in effect.* * *Section 2. Section 14.1 of the act is amended to read:Section 14.1. Preemption.--[(a) Except as set forth in subsection (b), this] This act shall preempt and supersede any local ordinance or rule concerning the subject matter of this act.[(b) This section does not prohibit local regulation pursuant to an ordinance which was adopted by a municipality prior to January 1, 2006, and which remained in effect on January 1, 2006.]20250SB0852PN0951 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. The addition of section 4(a.2) of the act shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on or after the effective date of this section.Section 4. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The amendment of the definition of "wage" under section 3(d) of the act shall take effect in six months.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0852PN0951 - 6 - 12345678